Utah statutes.
53A-2-213.   Intradistrict transfers for students impacted by boundary
changes -- Transportation of students who transfer within a district.
(1) (a)  In adjusting school boundaries, a local school board shall strive to
avoid requiring current students to change schools and shall, to the extent
reasonably feasible, accommodate parents who wish to avoid having their
children attend different schools of the same level because of boundary
changes which occur after one or more children in the family begin attending
one of the affected schools.
(b)  In granting interdistrict and intradistrict transfers to a particular
school, the local school board shall take into consideration the fact that an
applicant's brother or sister is attending the school or another school within
the district.
(2) (a)  A district shall receive transportation money under Sections 53A-
17a-126 and 53A-17a-127 for resident students who enroll in schools other than
the regularly assigned school on the basis of the distance from the student's
residence to the school the student would have attended had the intradistrict
attendance option not been used.
(b)  The parent or guardian of the student shall arrange for the student's
transportation to and from school, except that the district shall provide
transportation on the basis of available space on an approved route within the
district to the school of the student's attendance if the student would be
otherwise eligible for transportation to the same school from that point on
the bus route and the student's presence does not increase the cost of the bus
route.
